Missouri, session 2026, HB3224.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 57.450 and 57.452, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 57.450 and 57.452, to read as follows:
57.450. 1. The sheriff of the City of St. Louis shall be appointed by a majority of
the circuit judges and associate circuit judges of the twenty-second judicial circuit, en
banc. The sheriff in such circuit shall be removable for cause by a majority of the
circuit judges and associate circuit judges of such circuit, en banc, in accordance with
the Missouri supreme court administrative rules governing court personnel. Such
sheriff shall meet the same qualifications and requirements specified in subsection 1 of
section 57.010 for elected sheriffs. The sheriff holding office on August 28, 2026, shall
continue to hold such office for the remainder of his or her term. Notwithstanding the
provisions of section 57.080 to the contrary, should a vacancy occur from any cause in
the office of sheriff of the City of St. Louis during the remainder of the current term of
the elected sheriff, the vacancy shall be filled by appointment by a majority of the circuit
judges and associate circuit judges of the twenty-second judicial circuit, en banc.
2. All general laws relating and applicable to the sheriffs of the several counties of
this state shall apply to the same officer in the City of St. Louis, except that the sheriff of the
City of St. Louis shall not enforce the general criminal laws of the state of Missouri unless
such enforcement shall be incidental to the duties customarily performed by the sheriff of the
City of St. Louis. The sheriff and sworn deputies of the office of sheriff of the City of St.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3224 2
Louis may be eligible for training and licensure by the peace officer standards and training
commission under chapter 590, and such office shall be considered a law enforcement agency
with the sheriff and sworn deputies considered law enforcement officers. All acts and parts of
acts providing for any legal process to be directed to any sheriff of any county shall be so
construed as to mean the sheriff of the City of St. Louis as if such officer were specifically
named in such act.
57.452. The provisions of section 590.180 shall not apply to any [elected or
appointed] sheriff of a city not within a county.
✔